Utah statutes.
76-5-102.4.   Assault against peace officer or a military service member in
uniform -- Penalty.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Military service member in uniform" means:
(i)  a member of any branch of the United States military who is wearing a
uniform as authorized by the member's branch of service; or
(ii)  a member of the National Guard serving as provided in Section 39-1-5 or
39-1-9.
(b)  "Peace officer" means a law enforcement officer certified under Section
53-13-103.
(2) (a)  A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor, except as provided in
Subsection (2)(b), who:
(i)  assaults a peace officer, with knowledge that he is a peace officer, and
when the peace officer is acting within the scope of his authority as a peace
officer; or
(ii)  assaults a military service member in uniform when that service member
is on orders and acting within the scope of authority granted to the military
service member in uniform.
(b)  A person who violates this section and has been previously convicted of a
violation of this section is guilty of a third degree felony.
(3)  A person who violates this section shall serve, in jail or another
correctional facility, a minimum of:
(a)  90 consecutive days for a second offense; and
(b)  180 consecutive days for each subsequent offense.
(4)  The court may suspend the imposition or execution of the sentence
required under Subsection (3) if the court finds that the interests of justice
would be best served and makes specific findings concerning the disposition in
writing or on the record.
(5)  This section does not affect or limit any individual's constitutional
right to the lawful expression of free speech, the right of assembly, or any
other recognized rights secured by the Constitution or laws of Utah or by the
Constitution or laws of the United States.
